Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2007.03
Inheritance tax; property transferred to United States, state, or governmental subdivision; exempt.

Property transferred to either (1) the United States, or any of its departments, instrumentalities, or agencies, or (2) this state, or any governmental subdivision, department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, any municipal corporation or body politic created by or under the laws of Nebraska, or any agency, institution, foundation, or fund administered or operated by any of the same shall be exempt from any inheritance tax imposed by sections 77-2001 to 77-2006, and any amendments thereto.

Laws 1949, c. 241, § 2, p. 655.